Arizona, session 57th-2nd-regular, HB2384.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of the State of Arizona: Section 1. Section 15-342, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-342. Discretionary powers The governing board of a school district may: 1. Expel pupils for misconduct. 2. Exclude from grades one through eight children who are under six years of age. 3. Make such separation of groups of pupils as it the governing board deems advisable. 4. Maintain such special schools during vacation as deemed necessary for the benefit of the pupils of the school district. 5. Allow a superintendent or principal or representatives of the superintendent or principal to travel for a school purpose, as determined by a majority vote of the board. The board may allow members and members-elect of the board to travel within or without the school district for a school purpose and receive reimbursement. Any expenditure for travel and subsistence pursuant to this paragraph shall be as provided in title 38, chapter 4, article 2. The designated post of duty referred to in section 38-621 shall be construed, for school district governing board members, to be the member's actual place of residence, as opposed to the school district office or the school district boundaries. Such expenditures shall be a charge against the budgeted school district funds. The governing board of a school district shall prescribe procedures and amounts for reimbursement of lodging and subsistence expenses. Reimbursement amounts shall not exceed the maximum amounts established pursuant to section 38-624, subsection C. 6. Construct or provide in rural districts housing facilities for teachers and other school employees that the board determines are necessary to operate the school. 7. Sell or lease to the state, a county, a city, another school district or a tribal government agency any school property required for a public purpose if the sale or lease of the property will not affect the normal operations of a school within the school district.  A lease that a school district enters into pursuant to this paragraph must be for a term of not more than ten years without voter approval or not more than ninety-nine years with voter approval. 8. Annually budget and spend monies for membership in an association of school districts within this state. 9. Enter into leases or lease-purchase agreements for school buildings or grounds, or both, as lessor or as lessee, for periods of less than twenty years subject to voter approval for construction of school buildings as prescribed in section 15-341, subsection A, paragraph 7 and voter approval for a lease for a period of at least ten years.  A school district may enter into a lease-purchase agreement as lessee pursuant to this paragraph only if the school buildings or grounds are located within the geographic boundaries of the school district. 10. Subject to title 41, chapter 56, sell school sites or enter into leases or lease-purchase agreements for school buildings and grounds, as lessor or as lessee, for a period of twenty years or more, but not to exceed ninety-nine years if.  A school district may enter into a lease or lease-purchase agreement as lessee pursuant to this paragraph only if the school buildings or grounds are located within the geographic boundaries of the school district. Before any sale, lease or lease-purchase agreement is executed pursuant to this paragraph, the proposal must be authorized by a vote of the school district electors in an election called by the governing board as provided in section 15-491, except that authorization by the school district electors in an election is not required if the lease or lease-purchase agreement is for a period of not more than ten years or one of the following requirements is met: (a) The market value of the school property is less than $50,000 or the property is procured through a renewable energy development agreement, an energy performance contract, which among other items includes a renewable energy power service agreement, or a simplified energy performance contract pursuant to section 15-213.01. (b) The buildings and sites are completely funded with monies distributed by the school facilities division of school facilities within the department of administration or at the direction of the school facilities oversight board, or its predecessor. (c) The transaction involves the sale of improved or unimproved property pursuant to an agreement with the school facilities oversight board in which the school district agrees to sell the improved or unimproved property and transfer the proceeds of the sale to the school facilities oversight board in exchange for monies from the school facilities oversight board for the acquisition of a more suitable school site. For a sale of property acquired by a school district before July 9, 1998, a school district shall transfer to the school facilities oversight board that portion of the proceeds that equals the cost of the acquisition of a more suitable school site. If there are any remaining proceeds after the transfer of monies to the school facilities oversight board, a school district shall only use those remaining proceeds for future land purchases approved by the school facilities oversight board, or for capital improvements not funded by the school facilities oversight board for any existing or future facility. (d) The transaction involves the sale of improved or unimproved property pursuant to a formally adopted plan and the school district uses the proceeds of this sale to purchase other property that will be used for similar purposes as the property that was originally sold if the sale proceeds of the improved or unimproved property are used within two years after the date of the original sale to purchase the replacement property. If the sale proceeds of the improved or unimproved property are not used within two years after the date of the original sale to purchase replacement property, the sale proceeds shall be used toward paying any outstanding bonded indebtedness. If any sale proceeds remain after paying for outstanding bonded indebtedness, or if the district has no outstanding bonded indebtedness, sale proceeds shall be used to reduce the district's primary tax levy. A school district shall not use this subdivision unless all of the following conditions exist: (i) The school district is the sole owner of the improved or unimproved property that the school district intends to sell. (ii) The school district did not purchase the improved or unimproved property that the school district intends to sell with monies that were distributed pursuant to title 41, chapter 56. (iii) The transaction does not violate section 15-341, subsection G. 11. Review the decision of a teacher to promote a pupil to a grade or retain a pupil in a grade in a common school or to pass or fail a pupil in a course in high school. The pupil has the burden of proof to overturn the decision of a teacher to promote, retain, pass or fail the pupil.  In order to sustain the burden of proof, the pupil shall demonstrate to the governing board that the pupil has mastered the academic standards adopted by the state board of education pursuant to sections 15-701 and 15-701.01. If the governing board overturns the decision of a teacher pursuant to this paragraph, the governing board shall adopt a written finding that the pupil has mastered the academic standards. Notwithstanding title 38, chapter 3, article 3.1, the governing board shall review the decision of a teacher to promote a pupil to a grade or retain a pupil in a grade in a common school or to pass or fail a pupil in a course in high school in executive session unless a parent or legal guardian of the pupil or the pupil, if emancipated, disagrees that the review should be conducted in executive session and then the review shall be conducted in an open meeting. If the review is conducted in executive session, the board shall notify the teacher of the date, time and place of the review and shall allow the teacher to be present at the review. If the teacher is not present at the review, the board shall consult with the teacher before making its decision. Any request, including the written request as provided in section 15-341, the written evidence presented at the review and the written record of the review, including the decision of the governing board to accept or reject the teacher's decision, shall be retained by the governing board as part of its permanent records. 12. Provide transportation or site transportation loading and unloading areas for any child or children if deemed for in the best interest of the district, whether within or without the district, county or state. 13. Enter into intergovernmental agreements and contracts with school districts or other governing bodies as provided in section 11-952. Intergovernmental agreements and contracts between school districts or between a school district and other governing bodies as provided in section 11-952 are exempt from competitive bidding under the procurement rules adopted by the state board of education pursuant to section 15-213. 14. Include in the curricula it the governing board prescribes for high schools in the school district career and technical education, vocational education and technology education programs and career and technical, vocational and technology program improvement services for the high schools, subject to approval by the state board of education. The governing board may contract for the provision of career and technical, vocational and technology education as provided in section 15-789. 15. Suspend a teacher or administrator from the teacher's or administrator's duties without pay for a period of time of not to exceed more than ten school days,  if the board determines that suspension is warranted pursuant to section 15-341, subsection A, paragraph 21 or 22. 16. Dedicate school property within an incorporated city or town to that city or town or within a county to that county for use as a public right-of-way if both of the following apply: (a) Pursuant to an ordinance adopted by the city, town or county, there will be conferred on the school district privileges and benefits that may include benefits related to zoning. (b) The dedication will not affect the normal operation of any school within the district. 17. Enter into option agreements for the purchase of school sites only if the school sites are located within the geographic boundaries of the school district. 18. Donate surplus or outdated learning materials, educational equipment and furnishings to nonprofit community organizations if the governing board determines that the anticipated cost of selling the learning materials, educational equipment or furnishings equals or exceeds the estimated market value of the materials. 19. Prescribe policies to assess reasonable fees for students to use district-provided parking facilities. The fees are to be applied by the district solely against costs incurred in operating or securing the parking facilities. Any policy adopted by the governing board pursuant to this paragraph shall include a fee waiver provision in appropriate cases of need or economic hardship. 20. Establish alternative education programs that are consistent with the laws of this state to educate pupils, including pupils who have been reassigned pursuant to section 15-841, subsection E or F. 21. Require a period of silence to be observed at the commencement of the first class of the day in the schools. If a governing board chooses to require a period of silence to be observed, the teacher in charge of the room in which the first class is held shall announce that a period of silence not to exceed one minute in duration will be observed for meditation, and during that time no activities shall take place and silence shall be maintained. 22. Require students to wear uniforms. 23. Exchange unimproved property or improved property, including school sites, if the governing board determines that the improved property is unnecessary for the continued operation of the school district without requesting authorization by a vote of the school district electors and if the governing board determines that the exchange is necessary to protect the health, safety or welfare of pupils or if the governing board determines that the exchange is based on sound business principles for either: (a) Unimproved or improved property of equal or greater value. (b) Unimproved property that the owner contracts to improve if the value of the property ultimately received by the school district is of equal or greater value. 24. For common and high school pupils, assess reasonable fees for optional extracurricular activities and programs conducted when the common or high school is not in session, except that fees shall not be charged for pupils' access to or use of computers or related materials. For high school pupils, the governing board may assess reasonable fees for fine arts and vocational education courses and for optional services, equipment and materials offered to the pupils beyond those required to successfully complete the basic requirements of any other course, except that fees shall not be charged for pupils' access to or use of computers or related materials. Fees assessed pursuant to this paragraph shall be adopted at a public meeting after notice has been given to all parents of pupils enrolled at schools in the district and shall not exceed the actual costs of the activities, programs, services, equipment or materials. The governing board shall authorize principals to waive the assessment of all or part of a fee assessed pursuant to this paragraph if it creates an economic hardship for a pupil. For the purposes of this paragraph, "extracurricular activity" means any optional, noncredit, educational or recreational activity that supplements the education program of the school, whether offered before, during or after regular school hours. 25. Notwithstanding section 15-341, subsection A, paragraphs 7 and 9, construct school buildings and purchase or lease school sites for a term of not more than ten years, without a vote of the school district electors, if the buildings and sites are located within the geographic boundaries of the school district and are totally funded from one or more of the following: (a) Monies in the unrestricted capital outlay fund, except that the estimated cost shall not exceed $250,000 for a district that uses section 15-949. (b) Monies distributed at the direction of the school facilities oversight board established by section 41-5701.02 or by the school facilities division of school facilities within the department of administration pursuant to title 41, chapter 56. (c) Monies specifically donated for the purpose of constructing school buildings. This paragraph does not eliminate the requirement for an election to raise revenues for a capital outlay override pursuant to section 15-481 or a bond election pursuant to section 15-491. A school district governing board may purchase a school site pursuant to this paragraph only if the school site is located within the geographic boundaries of the school district. 26. Conduct a background investigation that includes a fingerprint check conducted pursuant to section 41-1750, subsection G for certificated personnel and personnel who are not paid employees of the school district, as a condition of employment. A school district may release the results of a background check to another school district for employment purposes. The school district may charge the costs of fingerprint checks to its fingerprinted employee, except that the school district may not charge the costs of fingerprint checks for personnel who are not paid employees of the school district. 27. Unless otherwise prohibited by law, sell advertising as follows: (a) Advertisements shall be age appropriate and not promote any substance that is illegal for minors such as alcohol, tobacco and drugs or gambling. Advertisements shall comply with the state sex education policy of abstinence. (b) Advertising approved by the governing board for the exterior of school buses may appear only on the sides of the bus in the following areas: (i) The signs shall be below the seat level rub rail and not extend above the bottom of the side windows. (ii) The signs shall be at least three inches from any required lettering, lamp, wheel well or reflector behind the service door or stop signal arm. (iii) The signs shall not extend from the body of the bus so as to allow a handhold or present a danger to pedestrians. (iv) The signs shall not interfere with the operation of any door or window. (v) The signs shall not be placed on any emergency doors. (c) The school district shall establish an advertisement fund that is composed of revenues from the sale of advertising. The monies in an advertisement fund are not subject to reversion. 28. Assess reasonable damage deposits to pupils in grades seven through twelve for using textbooks, musical instruments, band uniforms or other equipment required for academic courses. The governing board shall adopt policies on any damage deposits assessed pursuant to this paragraph at a public meeting called for this purpose after providing notice to all parents of pupils in grades seven through twelve in the school district. Principals of individual schools within the district may waive the damage deposit requirement for any textbook or other item if the payment of the damage deposit would create an economic hardship for the pupil. The school district shall return the full amount of the damage deposit for any textbook or other item if the pupil returns the textbook or other item in reasonably good condition within the time period prescribed by the governing board. For the purposes of this paragraph, "in reasonably good condition" means the textbook or other item is in the same or a similar condition as it was when the pupil received it, plus ordinary wear and tear. 29. Notwithstanding section 15-1105, expend spend surplus monies in the civic center school fund for maintenance and operations or unrestricted capital outlay if sufficient monies are available in the fund after meeting the needs of programs established pursuant to section 15-1105. 30. Notwithstanding section 15-1143, spend surplus monies in the community school program fund for maintenance and operations or unrestricted capital outlay if sufficient monies are available in the fund after meeting the needs of programs established pursuant to section 15-1142. 31. Adopt guidelines to standardize the format of the school report cards required by section 15-746 for schools within the district. 32. Adopt policies that require parental notification when a law enforcement officer interviews a pupil on school grounds. Policies adopted pursuant to this paragraph shall not impede a peace officer from performing the peace officer's duties. If the school district governing board adopts a policy that requires parental notification: (a) The policy may provide reasonable exceptions to the parental notification requirement. (b) The policy shall set forth whether and under what circumstances a parent may be present when a law enforcement officer interviews the pupil, including reasonable exceptions to the circumstances under which a parent may be present when a law enforcement officer interviews the pupil, and shall specify a reasonable maximum time after a parent is notified that an interview of a pupil by a law enforcement officer may be delayed to allow the parent to be present. 33. Enter into voluntary partnerships with any party to finance with monies other than school district monies and cooperatively design school facilities that comply with the adequacy standards prescribed in section 41-5711 and the square footage per pupil requirements pursuant to section 41-5741, subsection D, paragraph 3, subdivision (b). The design plans and location of any such school facility shall be submitted to the school facilities oversight board for approval pursuant to section 41-5741, subsection 0. If the school facilities oversight board approves the design plans and location of any such school facility, the party in partnership with the school district may cause to be constructed and the district may begin operating the school facility before monies are distributed at the direction of the school facilities oversight board pursuant to section 41-5741. Monies distributed from the new school facilities fund to a school district in a partnership with another party to finance and design the school facility shall be paid to the school district pursuant to section 41-5741. The school district shall reimburse the party in partnership with the school district from the monies paid to the school district pursuant to section 41-5741, in accordance with the voluntary partnership agreement. Before the school facilities oversight board directs the distribution of any monies pursuant to this subsection, the school district shall demonstrate to the school facilities oversight board that the facilities to be funded pursuant to section 41-5741, subsection O meet the minimum adequacy standards prescribed in section 41-5711. If the cost to construct the school facility exceeds the amount that the school district receives from the new school facilities fund, the partnership agreement between the school district and the other party shall specify that, except as otherwise provided by the other party, any such excess costs shall be the responsibility of the school district. The school district governing board shall adopt a resolution in a public meeting that an analysis has been conducted on the prospective effects of the decision to operate a new school with existing monies from the school district's maintenance and operations budget and how this decision may affect other schools in the school district. If a school district acquires land by donation at an appropriate school site approved by the school facilities oversight board and a school facility is financed and built on the land pursuant to this paragraph, the school facilities oversight board shall direct the distribution of an amount equal to twenty percent of the fair market value of the land that can be used for academic purposes. The school district shall place the monies in the unrestricted capital outlay fund and increase the unrestricted capital budget limit by the amount of the monies placed in the fund. Monies distributed under this paragraph shall be distributed from the new school facilities fund pursuant to section 41-5741. If a school district acquires land by donation at an appropriate school site approved by the school facilities oversight board and a school facility is financed and built on the land pursuant to this paragraph, the school district shall not receive monies for the donation of real property pursuant to section 41-5741, subsection F. It is unlawful for: (a) A county, city or town to require as a condition of any land use approval that a landowner or landowners that entered into a partnership pursuant to this paragraph provide any contribution, donation or gift, other than a site donation, to a school district. This subdivision only applies to the property in the voluntary partnership agreement pursuant to this paragraph. (b) A county, city or town to require as a condition of any land use approval that the landowner or landowners located within the geographic boundaries of the school subject to the voluntary partnership pursuant to this paragraph provide any donation or gift to the school district except as provided in the voluntary partnership agreement pursuant to this paragraph. (c) A community facilities district established pursuant to title 48, chapter 4, article 6 to be used for reimbursement of financing the construction of a school pursuant to this paragraph. (d) A school district to enter into an agreement pursuant to this paragraph with any party other than a master planned community party. Any land area consisting of at least three hundred twenty acres that is the subject of a development agreement with a county, city or town entered into pursuant to section 9-500.05 or 11-1101 shall be deemed to be a master planned community. For the purposes of this subdivision, "master planned community" means a land area consisting of at least three hundred twenty acres, which may be noncontiguous, that is the subject of a zoning ordinance approved by the governing body of the county, city or town in which the land is located that establishes the use of the land area as a planned area development or district, planned community development or district, planned unit development or district or other land use category or district that is recognized in the local ordinance of such county, city or town and that specifies the use of such land is for a master planned development. 34. Enter into an intergovernmental agreement with a presiding judge of the juvenile court to implement a law-related education program as defined in section 15-154. The presiding judge of the juvenile court may assign juvenile probation officers to participate in a law-related education program in any school district in the county. The cost of juvenile probation officers who participate in the program implemented pursuant to this paragraph shall be funded by the school district. 35. Offer to sell outdated learning materials, educational equipment or furnishings at a posted price commensurate with the value of the items to pupils who are currently enrolled in that school district before those materials are offered for public sale. 36. If the school district is a small school district as defined in section 15-901, and if allowed by federal law, opt out of federal grant opportunities if the governing board determines that the federal requirements impose unduly burdensome reporting requirements. 37. Prescribe and enforce policies and procedures for the emergency administration of inhalers by trained employees of the school district and nurses who are under contract with the school district pursuant to section 15-158. 38. Develop policies and procedures to allow principals to budget for or assist with budgeting federal, state and local monies. 39. Subject to article IX, section 7, Constitution of Arizona, the laws pertaining to travel and subsistence, gifts, grants, including federal grants, or devises and policies adopted by the department of education, provide food and beverages at school district events, including official school functions and trainings. END_STATUTE Sec. 2. Section 15-491, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-491. Elections on school property; exceptions A. The governing board of a school district may, and on petition of fifteen percent of the school electors as shown by the poll list at the last preceding annual school election shall, call an election for the following purposes: 1. To locate or change the location of school buildings. 2. To purchase or sell school sites or buildings or sell school sites pursuant to section 15-342 or to build school buildings, but the authorization by vote of the school district shall not necessarily specify the site to be purchased.  A school district governing board may not purchase a school site or building that is located outside the geographic boundaries of the school district. 3. To decide whether the bonds of the school district shall be issued and sold for the purpose of raising monies for purchasing or leasing school lots, for building or renovating school buildings, for supplying school buildings with furniture, equipment and technology, for improving school grounds, for purchasing pupil transportation vehicles or for liquidating any indebtedness already incurred for such purposes. Bonds issued for furniture, equipment and technology, other than fixtures, shall mature not later than the July 1 that follows the fifth year after the bonds were issued. A school district shall not issue class B bonds until the school district has obligated in contract the entire proceeds of any class A bonds issued by the school district. The total amount of class A and class B bonds issued by a school district shall not exceed the debt limitations prescribed in article IX, sections 8 and 8.1, Constitution of Arizona. 4. To lease for twenty or more at least ten years but not more than ninety-nine years, as lessor or as lessee, school buildings or grounds.  Approval by a majority of the school district electors voting authorizes the governing board to negotiate for and enter into a lease. The ballot shall list the school buildings or grounds for which a lease is sought.  If the governing board does not enter into a lease of twenty or more that is at least ten years but not more than ninety-nine years of the school buildings or grounds listed on the ballot within twenty ten years after the date of the election and the board continues to seek such a lease, the governing board shall call a special election to reauthorize the board to negotiate for and to enter into a lease of twenty or more that is at least ten years but not more than ninety-nine years. 5. To change the list of capital projects or the purposes authorized by prior voter approval to issue bonds. 6. To extend from six to ten years the time period to issue class B bonds authorized in 2009 or earlier.  Elections pursuant to this paragraph may not be held later than the sixth November after the election approving the issuance of the bonds. B. A petition is not required for holding the first election to be held in a joint common school district for any of the purposes specified in subsection A of this section. The certification of election results required by section 15-493 shall be made to the board of supervisors of the jurisdictional county. C. When the election is called to determine whether or not bonds of the school district shall be issued and sold for the purposes enumerated in the call for the election, the question shall be submitted to the vote of the qualified electors of the school district as defined in section 15-401 and subject to section 15-402. D. The governing board shall order the election to be held and the election notice and procedures to be conducted in the manner prescribed in title 35, chapter 3, article 3. If a petition for an election has been filed with the governing board as provided in subsection A of this section, the board shall act on the petition within sixty days by ordering the election to be held as provided in this subsection. If a school district bond election is scheduled for the same date a school district will hold an override election, the governing body shall deliver a copy of the notice of election and ballot to the county school superintendent who shall include the notice of election and ballot with the informational pamphlet and ballot prepared for the override election. Mailing of the information required for both the override and bond elections shall constitute compliance with the notice provisions of this section. E. The elections to be held pursuant to this section shall only be held on dates prescribed by section 16-204, except that elections held pursuant to this section to decide whether class B bonds shall be issued, or any other obligation incurred that will require the assessment of secondary property taxes, shall only be held on the first Tuesday after the first Monday of November. F. Subsection A, paragraph 2 of this section does not apply to the sale of school property if the market value of the school property is less than $50,000. G. Bond counsel fees, financial advisory fees, printing costs and paying agent and registrar fees for bonds issued pursuant to an election under this section shall be paid from either the amount authorized by the qualified electors of the school district or current operating funds. Bond election expenses shall be paid from current operating funds only. H. For any election conducted to decide whether class B bonds will be issued pursuant to this section: 1. Except as provided in paragraph 2 of this subsection, the ballot shall include the following statement: The capital improvements that are proposed to be funded through this bond issuance are to exceed the state standards and are in addition to monies provided by the state. __________ school district is proposing to issue class B general obligation bonds totaling $__________ to fund capital improvements over and above those funded by the state. Under the students first capital funding system, _________ school district is entitled to state monies for new construction and renovation of school buildings in accordance with state law. 2. For a school district that is a career technical education district, the ballot shall include the following statement: ________, a career technical education district, is proposing to issue class B general obligation bonds totaling $_________ to fund capital improvements at a campus owned or operated and maintained by the career technical education district. 3. The ballot shall conform to the requirements of title 35, chapter 3, article 3. 4. At least eighty-five days before the election, the school district shall submit proposed ballot language to the county school superintendent and the director of the Arizona legislative council. The director of the Arizona legislative council shall review the proposed ballot language to determine whether the proposed ballot language complies with this section. If the director of the Arizona legislative council determines that the proposed ballot language does not comply with this section, the director, within ten calendar days after receiving the proposed ballot language, shall notify the school district and the county school superintendent of the director's objections, and the school district shall resubmit revised ballot language to the director for approval. 5. Not later than thirty-five days before a class B bond election conducted pursuant to this section, the school district shall mail an informational pamphlet prepared by the county school superintendent to each household that contains a qualified elector in the school district.  The informational pamphlet shall contain, at a minimum, the following information: (a) An executive summary of the school district's most recent capital plan submitted to the school facilities oversight board. (b) A complete list of each proposed capital improvement that will be funded with the proceeds of the bonds and a description of the proposed cost of each improvement, including a separate aggregation of capital improvements for administrative purposes as defined by the school facilities oversight board. (c) The tax rate associated with each of the proposed capital improvements and the estimated cost of each capital improvement for the owner of a single family home that is valued at $100,000. I. For any election conducted to decide whether impact aid revenue bonds shall be issued pursuant to this section: 1. The ballot shall include the following statement: The capital improvements that are proposed to be funded through this bond issuance are to exceed the state standards and are in addition to monies provided by the state. __________ school district is proposing to issue impact aid revenue bonds totaling $__________ to fund capital improvements over and above those funded by the state. Under the students first capital funding system, _________ school district is entitled to state monies for new construction and renovation of school buildings in accordance with state law. 2. The ballot shall contain the words "bond approval, yes" and "bond approval, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice. 3. At least eighty-five days before the election, the school district shall submit proposed ballot language to the director of the legislative council.  The director of the legislative council shall review the proposed ballot language to determine whether the proposed ballot language complies with this section. If the director of the legislative council determines that the proposed ballot language does not comply with this section, the director, within ten calendar days after receiving the proposed ballot language, shall notify the school district of the director's objections, and the school district shall resubmit revised ballot language to the director for approval. 4. Not later than thirty-five days before an impact aid revenue bond election conducted pursuant to this section, the school district shall mail an informational pamphlet prepared by the county school superintendent to each household that contains a qualified elector in the school district.  The informational pamphlet shall contain, at a minimum, the following information: (a) The date of the election. (b) The voter's polling place and the times it is open. (c) An executive summary of the school district's most recent capital plan submitted to the school facilities oversight board. (d) A complete list of each proposed capital improvement that will be funded with the proceeds of the bonds and a description of the proposed cost of each improvement, including a separate aggregation of capital improvements for administrative purposes as defined by the school facilities oversight board. (e) A statement that impact aid revenue bonds will be fully funded by aid that the school district receives from the federal government and do not require a levy of taxes in the district. (f) A statement that if the bonds are approved, the first priority for the impact aid will be to pay the debt service for the bonds and that other uses of the monies are prohibited until the debt service obligation is met. (g) A statement that if the impact aid revenue bonds are approved, the school district shall not issue or sell class B bonds while the district has existing indebtedness from impact aid revenue bonds, except for bonds issued to refund any bonds issued by the board. J. If the voters approve the issuance of school district class B bonds or impact aid revenue bonds, the school district shall not use the bond proceeds for any purposes other than the proposed capital improvements listed in the informational pamphlet, except that up to ten percent of the bond proceeds may be used for general capital expenses, including cost overruns of proposed capital improvements. The proposed capital improvements may be changed by a subsequent election as provided by this section. K. Each school district that issues bonds under this section shall hold a public meeting each year between September 1 and October 31, until the bond proceeds are spent, at which an update of the progress of capital improvements financed through bonding is discussed and at which the public is allowed an opportunity to comment. At a minimum, the update shall include a comparison of the current status and the original projections on the construction of capital improvements, the costs of capital improvements and the costs of capital improvements in progress or completed since the prior meeting and the future capital bonding plans of the school district. The school district shall include in the public meeting a discussion of the school district's use of state capital aid and voter-approved capital overrides in funding capital improvements, if any. L. If an election is held to change the purpose or list of capital projects authorized by prior voter approval to issue bonds pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 5 of this section, the following requirements apply: 1. The election may be held only on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November. 2. Not later than thirty-five days before the election, the school district shall mail an informational pamphlet prepared by the county school superintendent to each household in the school district that contains a qualified elector. The informational pamphlet shall contain, at a minimum, the following information: (a) The date of the election. (b) The voter's polling place and the times it is open. (c) A statement as to why the election was called. (d) A complete list of each proposed capital improvement that is in addition to the initial capital improvements presented in the informational pamphlet when the bonds were approved and the proposed cost of each improvement, including a separate aggregation of capital improvements for administrative purposes as defined by the school facilities oversight board. (e) A complete list of each capital improvement that was presented in the informational pamphlet when the bonds were initially approved and that is proposed to be eliminated or to have its cost reduced, and the proposed cost of each improvement, including a separate aggregation of capital improvements for administrative purposes as defined by the school facilities oversight board. (f) Arguments for and against the proposed change, if submitted, as provided by section 15-481, subsection B, paragraph 9. The ballot arguments for the proposed change shall be signed as the governing board of the school district without listing any member's individual name for the arguments for the proposed change. 3. The ballot shall contain the words "change capital improvements, yes" and "change capital improvements, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice. 4. If the election is to add a purpose that was not on the initial ballot, the ballot shall list the purpose that is proposed to be added. M. If an election is held to extend the time to issue bonds pursuant to subsection A, paragraph 6 of this section, the following requirements apply: 1. The election may be held only on the first Tuesday after the first Monday in November. 2. Not later than thirty-five days before the election, the school district shall mail an informational pamphlet prepared by the county school superintendent to each household in the school district that contains a qualified elector. The informational pamphlet shall contain, at a minimum, the following information: (a) The date of the election. (b) The voter's polling place and the times it is open. (c) A statement as to why the election was called. (d) Arguments for and against the proposed change, if submitted, as provided in section 15-481, subsection B, paragraph 9. The ballot arguments for the proposed change shall be signed as the governing board of the school district without listing any member's individual name for the arguments for the proposed change. 3. The ballot shall contain the words "extend time to issue bonds, yes" and "extend time to issue bonds, no", and the voter shall signify the voter's desired choice. END_STATUTE Sec. 3. Section 15-1102, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-1102. Disposition of proceeds from sale or lease of school property; school plant monies; payment of bonded indebtedness; definition A. The governing board, or the superintendent or chief administrative officer with the approval of the governing board: , 1. May expend spend the proceeds from the sale or lease of school property for the payment of any outstanding bonded indebtedness of the school district or for the reduction of school district taxes. 2. Shall spend the proceeds from the lease of school property for the payment of any outstanding bonded indebtedness of the school district or for the reduction of school district taxes. B. A common school district or a high school district that has an outstanding bonded indebtedness of seven percent of the current year's assessed valuation or less or a unified school district that has an outstanding bonded indebtedness of fourteen percent of the current year's assessed valuation or less may expend spend the proceeds from the sale or lease of school property as follows: 1. The total sum of the proceeds from the sale of school property executed before July 1, 2016, for or the total sum of the proceeds from the sale of property to a school or the total sum of the proceeds from the lease of school property to persons or entities other than schools for more than one year: (a) May be expended spent for maintenance and operation in an amount that does not exceed fifteen percent of the revenue control limit for that year as provided in section 15-947, subsection A in any year. (b) May be expended spent for capital outlay in any amount. 2. From and after June 30, 2016, proceeds from the sale of school property that exceed one hundred thousand dollars $100,000 per sales transaction to persons or entities other than schools may not be expended spent for maintenance and operation and may be expended spent for capital outlay in any amount. C. A common school district or a high school district that has an outstanding bonded indebtedness of greater than seven percent of the current year's assessed valuation or a unified school district that has an outstanding bonded indebtedness of greater than fourteen percent of the current year's assessed valuation may expend spend the proceeds from the lease or sale of school property as follows: 1. For the total sum of the proceeds from the sale of school property executed before July 1, 2016,  or for the total sum of the proceeds from the sale of property to a school or for the total sum of the proceeds from the lease of school property to persons or entities other than schools for more than one year: (a) Up to twenty-five percent of the sales proceeds may be expended spent for maintenance and operation in an amount that does not exceed fifteen percent of the revenue control limit for that year as provided in section 15-947, subsection A in any year. (b) The sales or lease proceeds may be expended spent for capital outlay in any amount. 2. From and after June 30, 2016, for proceeds from the sale of school property that exceed one hundred thousand dollars $100,000 per sales transaction to persons or entities other than schools: (a) The sales proceeds may not be expended spent for maintenance and operation. (b) the school district shall use at least thirty-eight percent of the sales proceeds shall be used for the payment of any outstanding bonded indebtedness of the school district or for the reduction of school district taxes. (c) The remainder of the sales proceeds that are not obligated pursuant to subdivision (b) of this paragraph may be expended spent for capital outlay in any amount. D. The governing board, or the superintendent or chief administrative officer with the approval of the governing board, shall promptly deposit monies received for and derived from the sale or lease of school property with the county treasurer who shall establish a school plant fund. Monies placed to the credit of the school plant fund may be expended as provided in this section. The school plant fund is a continuing fund that is not subject to reversion. E. Proceeds from sales by condemnation or sales under threat of condemnation may be deposited with the county treasurer for deposit in the condemnation fund or the school plant fund of the school district. The condemnation fund is a continuing fund that is not subject to reversion, except that after ten years any unspent monies shall be placed in the school plant fund to be used as prescribed in this section. The governing board, or the superintendent or chief administrative officer with the approval of the governing board, may apply the proceeds in the condemnation fund to: 1. The payment of any outstanding bonded indebtedness of the school district that is payable from the levy of taxes on property within the school district. 2. Construct, acquire, improve, repair or furnish school facilities or sites after notice and a hearing. F. Proceeds from a right-of-way settlement shall be deposited with the county treasurer for deposit in the condemnation fund of the school district. The governing board, or the superintendent or chief administrative officer with the approval of the governing board, shall apply those proceeds in the condemnation fund to construct, acquire, improve, repair or furnish school facilities or sites after notice and a hearing. G. The restrictions prescribed in subsections B and C of this section do not apply to the proceeds from: 1. Leases of school property to other schools. 2. Leases of school property for less than one year. 3. sales of school property of less than one hundred thousand dollars $100,000 per transaction. H. A lease of school property for less than one year that includes an automatic lease renewal resulting in a total lease duration that exceeds one year is considered a lease for more than one year for the purposes of this section. I. H. For the purposes of this section, "capital outlay" means unrestricted capital outlay as prescribed in section 15-903, subsection C. END_STATUTE Sec. 4. Section 15-1105, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE15-1105. Lease of school property; immunity; fee schedule; use of monies; prohibition; tax exemption; definitions A. The school district governing board, or the superintendent or chief administrative officer with the approval of the governing board, may lease school property, including school buildings, grounds, buses and equipment, for a term of not more than ten years without voter approval or not more than ninety-nine years with voter approval to any person, group or organization for any lawful purpose, including any recreational, educational, political, economic, artistic, moral, scientific, social, religious or other civic or governmental purpose in the interest of the community, including extended day resource programs.  The governing board, superintendent or chief administrative officer shall charge a reasonable use fee for the lease of the school property, which may include goods contributed or services rendered by the person, group or organization to the school district. B. The governing board, or the superintendent or chief administrative officer with the approval of the governing board, may permit allow the uncompensated use of school buildings, grounds, buses, equipment and other school property by any school related school-related group, including student political organizations, or by any organization whose membership is open to the public and whose activities promote the educational function of the school district as determined in good faith by the school district's governing board, or the superintendent or chief administrative officer with the approval of the governing board, including extended day resource programs, except as provided in section 15-511. C. A school district and its employees, including the governing board, superintendent or chief administrative officer, are immune from civil liability with respect to all decisions made and actions taken to allow the lease or use of school property, unless the school district or its employees are guilty of gross negligence or intentional misconduct. This subsection does not limit any other immunity provisions that are prescribed by law. D. A person, group or organization that is otherwise eligible to lease school property shall not be denied use of or charged differentiated fees for school property on the basis of the person's, group's or organization's beliefs, expression of beliefs or exercise of the rights of association that are protected under the laws of this state, the Constitution of Arizona, the laws of the United States or and the United States Constitution. E. The governing board shall annually approve a fee schedule for the lease of school property. The fee schedule shall include a designation of the persons, groups or organizations that shall have uncompensated use of the school property,  and a procedure for determining the value of goods and services being provided as compensation for the use of school property. The governing board, superintendent or chief administrative officer shall require proof of liability insurance for such use or lease of school property. F. Except as provided in section 15-1102, monies received for and derived from the use or lease of school property under this section shall be promptly deposited with the county treasurer, who shall credit the deposits to the civic center school fund of the respective school district. Monies placed to the credit of a civic center school fund may be expended spent for civic center school purposes by warrants drawn upon on an order of the school district governing board, or the superintendent or chief administrative officer with the approval of the governing board. The civic center school fund of a school district or multiple school district civic center school program is a continuing fund not subject to reversion, except upon on termination of a civic center school program. Upon On termination of a civic center school program, any remaining funds shall monies revert to the school plant fund of the school district or districts. G. Notwithstanding sections 15-342, 15-491, 15-789 and 41-5704 and subsection A of this section, a school district governing board may not lease, or approve the lease, of school property to any person or for any person if the school district leased that property, in whole or in part, from another person. H. Property and buildings that are leased from a school district pursuant to section 15-342, 15-491, 15-789 or 41-5704 or this section are: 1. Eligible for a tax exemption pursuant to section 42-11104 only if the property and buildings are used for education purposes. 2. Not eligible for a tax exemption pursuant to section 42-11133. G. I. For the purposes of this section: 1. "Educational function" means uses a use that are is directly related to the educational mission of the school district as adopted by the school district governing board and includes parent-teacher organizations, youth organizations and school employee organizations. 2. "Extended day resource programs" means activities offered on school property before or after school or at times when school is not customarily in session for children who are of the age required for kindergarten programs and grades one through eight. The program may be offered for children who are of the age required for a kindergarten program or for one grade or for any combination of kindergarten programs and grades. Activities may include physical conditioning, tutoring, supervised homework or arts activities. 3. "Reasonable use fee" means an amount that is at least equal to the school district's cost for utilities, services, supplies or personnel that the school provides to the lessee pursuant to the terms of the lease. END_STATUTE Sec. 5. Title 41, chapter 56, article 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended by adding section 41-5702.01, to read: START_STATUTE41-5702.01. School district real estate holdings; reporting requirements; definition A. On or before october 1, 2026 and each year thereafter, each school district shall report to the division all of the following information about each real estate holding that is owned or leased by the school district during the immediately preceding school year: 1. The address of the real estate holding. 2. A description of the real estate holding, including any structure, building or other improvement that is part of the real estate holding. The description required by this paragraph must include the size of the lot and the square footage of any structure that is located on the lot. 3. A description of the current use of each building that is part of the real estate holding. 4. Whether the real estate holding, or any part of the real estate holding, is located outside the geographic boundaries of the school district. 5. The owner of the real estate holding. 6. If the real estate holding is subject to a lease agreement, all of the following: (a) The parties to the lease agreement. (b) The term of the lease. (c) An estimate of the total amount of revenue that will be generated by the lease agreement. (d) The total amount that was received or paid by the school district pursuant to the lease agreement during the immediately preceding school year. B. The division shall compile the reports received from each school district pursuant to subsection A of this section into a single comprehensive report for the previous school year and, on or before december 1, 2026 and each year thereafter, shall submit this report to the governor, the president of the senate and the speaker of the house of representatives and shall provide a copy to the secretary of state. C. For the purposes of this section, "real estate holding" means any real property if the school district either owns the property or leases the property as lessee and any of the following applies: 1. The school district leases the property as lessor. 2. The property, or any part of the property, is used for nonacademic purposes. 3. The property, or any part of the property, is located outside the geographic boundaries of the school district. END_STATUTE Sec. 6. Section 42-11104, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-11104. Exemption for educational and library property A. Libraries, colleges, school buildings and other buildings that are used for education, with their furniture, libraries and equipment and the land that is appurtenant to and used with them, are exempt from taxation if they are used for education and not used or held for profit. B. Property and buildings are exempt from taxation if leased from: 1. A school district pursuant to a lease or lease-purchase agreement under section 15-342, paragraph 9 or 10 if the property and buildings are used for education purposes. 2. A community college district pursuant to a lease or lease-purchase agreement under section 15-1444. C. Property and buildings, including land, improvements, furniture and equipment, that are owned by a nonprofit organization that is recognized under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code and that operates as: 1. A charter school pursuant to section 15-183 are exempt from taxation beginning on the date the nonprofit organization acquires ownership of the property and buildings if the property and buildings are used for education and are not used or held for profit. 2. A trap and skeet shooting club that teaches, trains, sponsors, coaches or hosts or sponsors clinics, shooting leagues, competitive tournaments or other events, including hunter and firearm safety classes, are exempt from taxation if the property and buildings are used for education purposes and not used or held for profit. 3. A residential treatment and education facility are exempt from taxation beginning on the date the nonprofit organization acquires ownership of the property and buildings if the property and buildings are used for education and are not used or held for profit. D. Within ten days after receiving an initial affidavit of eligibility submitted under section 42-11152, subsection A, paragraph 1 by a nonprofit organization described under subsection C of this section, the county assessor, on request, shall issue a receipt for the affidavit. E. A nonprofit organization described under subsection C of this section shall file with the assessor the affidavit required by section 42-11152 and evidence of the organization's tax exempt tax-exempt status under section 501(c)(3) of the internal revenue code when initially claiming the exemption. F. A nonprofit organization described under subsection C of this section that acquires ownership of property that was previously owned by another nonprofit organization and used primarily for education shall comply with the requirements of section 42-11152 to qualify and establish eligibility for exemption. G. If a nonprofit organization described under subsection C of this section that holds title to property used primarily for education fails to file the affidavit required by section 42-11152 in a timely manner, but otherwise qualifies for exemption, the county board of supervisors, on petition by the organization, shall direct the county treasurer to: 1. Refund any property taxes paid by the organization for a tax year if the organization submits a claim for the refund to the county treasurer within one year after the date the taxes were paid. The county treasurer shall pay the claim within thirty days after it is submitted to the treasurer. The county treasurer is entitled to a credit for the refund in the next accounting period with each taxing jurisdiction to which the tax monies may have been transmitted. 2. Forgive and strike off from the tax roll any property taxes and accrued interest and penalties that are due but not paid.END_STATUTE Sec. 7. Section 42-11133, Arizona Revised Statutes, is amended to read: START_STATUTE42-11133. Exemption for affordable housing projects; definition A. Property that is used exclusively for affordable rental housing pursuant to section 42 of the internal revenue code or another recorded restrictive covenant imposed by financing for affordable housing and related facilities are is exempt from taxation if: 1. The property is owned and operated by, or is a wholly owned subsidiary of, a corporation that is qualified pursuant to section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(4) of the internal revenue code or a limited partnership or limited liability company in which the general partner or the managing member, as applicable, is an eligible nonprofit corporation or a single purpose entity that is wholly owned by one or more eligible nonprofit corporations. 2. Either of the following applies: (a) The acquisition, rehabilitation, development or operation of the property, or any combination of these factors, is financed with tax exempt tax-exempt mortgage revenue bonds or general obligation bonds or is financed by local, state or federal loans or grants and the amount of rent paid by or on behalf of the occupants does not exceed the amount of rent that is prescribed by deed restrictions or by regulatory agreements pursuant to the property's financing or financial assistance terms. (b) The owner of the property is eligible for and receives tax credits for low-income or moderate-income residential housing established under section 42 of the internal revenue code and the amount of rent paid by or on behalf of the occupants does not exceed the amount that is prescribed by deed restrictions or by regulatory agreements pursuant to the property's financing or financial assistance terms. 3. The property is not leased from a school district. B. To qualify under this section, the owner of the property must: 1. For any claim that is filed in any fiscal year, certify and ensure, subject to paragraph 2 of this subsection, that there is an enforceable and verifiable agreement with a public agency, a recorded deed restriction or any other legal document that restricts the use of the property and requires that the rents do not exceed the terms that are prescribed by the financing or financial assistance terms. 2. Certify that the monies that would have been necessary to pay the property taxes are used to maintain the affordability of or otherwise reduce the rents of the units that are occupied by eligible low-income households. C. For the purposes of this section, "eligible nonprofit corporation" means a corporation that is qualified pursuant to section 501(c)(3) or 501(c)(4) of the internal revenue code and for which one of its exempt purposes includes providing affordable housing.END_STATUTE Sec. 8. Existing leases; applicability; tax exemption A. Sections 15-342, 15-491 and 15-1105, Arizona Revised Statutes, as amended by this act, apply to any lease that is executed, renewed or amended after the effective date of this act. B. Property, buildings and improvements are exempt from taxation pursuant to section 42-11104, subsection B, paragraph 1, Arizona Revised Statutes, if all of the following apply: 1. The buildings and improvements are constructed on land that is leased from a school district. 2. The lease was executed on or before January 1, 2026. 3. The buildings and improvements become the property of the school district on termination of the lease.